src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON n3 ! middel
 +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 er-ene-a ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON n3b ! lager
 +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 e-ene-a ;
        +N:   R       ;

LEXICON n3c ! fe
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ne ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON n4 ! kriterium
 +N+Neu+Sg:X5 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 er-ene-a ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON n4b ! faktum
 +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 a-aene ;
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON n5 ! middel
 +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X1 er-ene-a ;
        +N:   R        ;



LEXICON FORUM ! forum
 +N+Neu+Sg:um 0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   a-aene ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Use/NG:um er-ene ;
        +N:um R      ;

LEXICON LEKSIKON ! leksikon
 +N+Neu+Sg:on 0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   a-aene ;
        +N:on R      ;

LEXICON MUSEUM
 +N+Neu+Sg:um 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   er-ene-a ;
        +N:um R        ;

LEXICON KLÆR
 +N+Neu+Pl:klær 0-ne  ;

 LEXICON TRE
 +N+Neu+Sg:e  0-et  ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:æ  r-rne ;

LEXICON TEMPUS ! tempus:temp TEMPUS ;
          :us     n1 ;
 +N+Neu+Sg:ora    K  ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:oraene K  ;
        +N:us     R  ;

LEXICON TÅ
 +N+Fem+Sg:tå  0-a  ;
 +N+Msc+Use/NG:tåen # ;
 +N+Fem+Pl:tæ  r-rne ;

! Lexica for definiteness declension
! ==================================

LEXICON a-aene
 +Indef:%>a    K ;
   +Def:%>aene K ;

LEXICON e-ne
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON e-ene
 +Indef:%>e   K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON e-ene-a
 +Indef:%>e   K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
   +Def:%>a   K ;

LEXICON er-ene
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON e-er-ene
 +Indef+Use/NG:%>e   K ;
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON er-ene-a
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
   +Def:%>a   K ;

LEXICON ar-ane	 !! @CODE@ for nynorsk only.
 +Indef:%>ar  K ; !!
   +Def:%>ane K ; !!

LEXICON 0-ane !! @CODE@ for nynorsk only.
 +Indef:      K ;
   +Def:%>ane K ;

LEXICON r-rne  ! trær
 +Indef:%>r   K ;
   +Def:%>rne K ;

LEXICON r-ne  ! gamledager
 +Indef:%>r  K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON 0-a
        +Indef:    K ;
          +Def:%>a K ;
! +Def+Radical:%>a K ; ! If needed

LEXICON 0-en
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>en K ;

LEXICON 0-ene
 +Indef:      K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

!LEXICON 0-er-ene
! +Indef:      K ;
! +Indef:%>er  K ;
!   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-er-ene-a
 +Indef:      K ;
 +Indef+Use/NG:%>er  K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
   +Def:%>a   K ;

LEXICON 0-ne
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON 0-et
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>et K ;

LEXICON 0-ene-a
        +Indef:      K ;
          +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
          +Def:%>a   K ;
! +Def+Radical:%>a   K ; ! If needed

LEXICON en ! Use 0-en instead
! +Indef:     K ; ! commented out for dict, comment
               ! in again for eventual syntax ("en dør")
    +Def:%>en K ; ! døren = dør+N+Msc :-/

LEXICON 0-e
 +Indef:    K ;
   +Def:%>e K ;

LEXICON e-e
 +Indef:%>e K ;
   +Def:%>e K ;
