src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3_letter
kne+CmpNP/None:kn  TRE ; 
LEXICON Noun
nasjonalsymbol n3 ;
faktum n4b ;
kvantum n4b ;
votum n4b ;
tillitsvotum n4b ;
kontinuum n4b ;
passivum n4b ;
aktivum n4b ;
overvåkingsorgan n3 ;
forvaltningsorgan n3 ;
resultat n3 ;
sameparlament n3 ;
liknament n3 ;
incitament n3 ;
sidearrangement n3 ;
idrettarrangement n3 ;
nivå n3 ;
barnehagenivå n3 ;
grunnskolenivå n3 ;
klassenivå n3 ;
partinivå n3 ;
kolesterolnivå n3 ;
jernnivå n3 ;
saksbehandlernivå n3 ;
husholdsnivå n3 ;
øvingsnivå n3 ;
ambisjonsnivå n3 ;
konfliktnivå n3 ;
skoleresultat n3 ;
beregningsresultat n3 ;
læringsresultat n3 ;
blad n3 ;
rulleblad n3 ;
dagblad n3 ;
kronblad n3 ;
spinnerblad n3 ;
medlemsblad n3 ;
reindriftsblad n3 ;
aksjemarked n3 ;
mobilmarked n3 ;
produktmarked n3 ;
lettlesthefte n3 ;
TS-middel n3 ;
virkemiddel n3 ;
vaskemiddel n3 ;
gruppemiddel n3 ;
kompetansemiddel n3 ;
botemiddel n3 ;
plantevernmiddel n3 ;
næringsutviklingsmiddel n3 ;
befordringsmiddel n3 ;
konserveringsmiddel n3 ;
flussmiddel n3 ;
prosjektmiddel n3 ;
messehagel n3 ;
tingeltangel n3 ;
tabernakel n3 ;
spetakkel n3 ;
sparkel n3 ;
skrekkeksempel n3 ;
gospel n3 ;
bendsel n3 ;
botsfengsel n3 ;
laksestengsel n3 ;
sommerstengsel n3 ;
gjømsel n3 ;
oppebørsel n3 ;
kapittel n3 ;
ikrafttredelseskapittel n3 ;
tvistespørsmål n3 ;
armeringsstål n3 ;
tonem n3 ;
fastlegesystem n3 ;
hovedbæresystem n3 ;
valgsystem n3 ;
seksagesimalsystem n3 ;
ordoviciumsystem n3 ;
karaktersystem n3 ;
utviklingssystem n3 ;
forvaltningssystem n3 ;
evalueringssystem n3 ;
titallssystem n3 ;
konsesjonssystem n3 ;
inntektssystem n3 ;
kredittsystem n3 ;
variatorreim n3 ;
våpen n3 ;
militærvesen n3 ;
nummer n3 ;
journalnummer n3 ;
registreringsnummer n3 ;
organisasjonsnummer n3 ;
riksteater n3 ;
grendesenter n3 ;
planregister n3 ;
kvalitetsregister n3 ;
bosetningsmønster n3 ;
kloster n3 ;
bispedømmekontor n3 ;
familievernkontor n3 ;
arkivkontor n3 ;
palass n3 ;
søkeresultat n3 ;
språkvitaliseringsprosjekt n3 ;
verbum n4 ;
philosophicum n4 ;
fluidum n4 ;
memorandum n4 ;
referendum n4 ;
lyceum n4 ;
jubileum n4 ;
årsjubileum n4 ;
linoleum n4 ;
petroleum n4 ;
mausoleum n4 ;
colosseum n4 ;
museum n4 ;
bygdemuseum n4 ;
nordområdemuseum n4 ;
folkemuseum n4 ;
samemuseum n4 ;
kvenmuseum n4 ;
forvaltningsmuseum n4 ;
universitetsmuseum n4 ;
friluftsmuseum n4 ;
sjøfartsmuseum n4 ;
kunstmuseum n4 ;
amfibium n4 ;
erbium n4 ;
ytterbium n4 ;
beneficium n4 ;
francium n4 ;
vanadium n4 ;
stadium n4 ;
planstadium n4 ;
medium n4 ;
bildemedium n4 ;
massemedium n4 ;
underholdingsmedium n4 ;
nettmedium n4 ;
iridium n4 ;
scandium n4 ;
nordområdestipendium n4 ;
rekrutteringsstipendium n4 ;
indium n4 ;
rhodium n4 ;
podium n4 ;
postludium n4 ;
dybdestudium n4 ;
kulturfagstudium n4 ;
masterstudium n4 ;
gymnasstudium n4 ;
tidsstudium n4 ;
halvtidsstudium n4 ;
befolkningsstudium n4 ;
praksisstudium n4 ;
profesjonsstudium n4 ;
universitetsstudium n4 ;
satellittstudium n4 ;
privilegium n4 ;
beskatningsprivilegium n4 ;
handelsprivilegium n4 ;
kollegium n4 ;
evangelium n4 ;
kranium n4 ;
ruthenium n4 ;
hahnium n4 ;
gadolinium n4 ;
råaluminium n4 ;
protactinium n4 ;
pelargonium n4 ;
testimonium n4 ;
californium n4 ;
europium n4 ;
herbarium n4 ;
ulykkesscenarium n4 ;
akvarium n4 ;
kriterium n4 ;
språkkriterium n4 ;
tildelingskriterium n4 ;
vurderingskriterium n4 ;
bosettingskriterium n4 ;
nødvendighetskriterium n4 ;
stabilitetskriterium n4 ;
skogbruksministerium n4 ;
delirium n4 ;
suspensorium n4 ;
sanatorium n4 ;
laboratorium n4 ;
søvnlaboratorium n4 ;
veterinærlaboratorium n4 ;
loboratorium n4 ;
observatorium n4 ;
territorium n4 ;
proprium n4 ;
yttrium n4 ;
martyrium n4 ;
handelsgymnasium n4 ;
symposium n4 ;
konsortium n4 ;
begynnerkollokvium n4 ;
khartoum n4 ;
sørum n4 ;
slipemiddel n5 ;
sosialmiddel n5 ;
fondsmiddel n5 ;
søtningsmiddel n5 ;
skjøtselsmiddel n5 ;
fremkomstmiddel n5 ;
budsjettmiddel n5 ;
hinder n5 ;
politikammer n5 ;
strafferegister n5 ;
bøteregister n5 ;
tre:tr TRE ;
eiketre:eiketr TRE ;
lerketre:lerketr TRE ;
bjørketre:bjørketr TRE ;
bøketre:bøketr TRE ;
mangletre:mangletr TRE ;
hylletre:hylletr TRE ;
juletre:juletr TRE ;
rognetre:rognetr TRE ;
hespetre:hespetr TRE ;
bogtre:bogtr TRE ;
feiltre:feiltr TRE ;
balltre:balltr TRE ;
bartre:bartr TRE ;
sedertre:sedertr TRE ;
slektstre:slektstr TRE ;
furutre:furutr TRE ;
løvtre:løvtr TRE ;
museum:muse MUSEUM ;
forvaltningsmuseum:forvaltningsmuse MUSEUM ;
vitenskapsmuseum:vitenskapsmuse MUSEUM ;
TS-forum:TS-for FORUM ;
forum:for FORUM ;
kvinneforum:kvinnefor FORUM ;
kompetanseforum:kompetansefor FORUM ;
dialogforum:dialogfor FORUM ;
språkforum:språkfor FORUM ;
mineralforum:mineralfor FORUM ;
samordningsforum:samordningsfor FORUM ;
trafikksikkerhetsforum:trafikksikkerhetsfor FORUM ;
debattforum:debattfor FORUM ;
leksikon:leksik LEKSIKON ;
hovedleksikon:hovedleksik LEKSIKON ;
brukerleksikon:brukerleksik LEKSIKON ;
tilleggsleksikon:tilleggsleksik LEKSIKON ;
oppdateringsleksikon:oppdateringsleksik LEKSIKON ;
onomatopoetikon:onomatopoetik LEKSIKON ;
klær: KLÆR ;
mammaklær:mamma KLÆR ;
handklær:hand KLÆR ;
håndklær:hånd KLÆR ;
sengeklær:senge KLÆR ;
skoleklær:skole KLÆR ;
herreklær:herre KLÆR ;
dongeriklær:dongeri KLÆR ;
benklær:ben KLÆR ;
regnklær:regn KLÆR ;
beinklær:bein KLÆR ;
ytterklær:ytter KLÆR ;
overklær:over KLÆR ;
arbeidsklær:arbeids KLÆR ;
treningsklær:trenings KLÆR ;
åklær:å KLÆR ;
tempus:temp TEMPUS ;
kråketå:kråke TÅ ;
lilletå:lille TÅ ;
stortå:stor TÅ ;
stipendmiddel n3b ;
legemiddel n3b ;
jordskiftevirkemiddel n3b ;
boligvirkemiddel n3b ;
investeringsvirkemiddel n3b ;
opplæringsvirkemiddel n3b ;
prisvirkemiddel n3b ;
avtalemiddel n3b ;
sparemiddel n3b ;
multimedialæremiddel n3b ;
sovemiddel n3b ;
forskningmiddel n3b ;
språkmiddel n3b ;
risikomiddel n3b ;
kulturmiddel n3b ;
tilskuddsmiddel n3b ;
utviklingsmiddel n3b ;
språkutviklingsmiddel n3b ;
næringsutviklingsmiddel n3b ;
likestillingsmiddel n3b ;
utredningsmiddel n3b ;
forskningsmiddel n3b ;
stimuleringsmiddel n3b ;
investeringsmiddel n3b ;
rekrutteringsmiddel n3b ;
språkopplæringsmiddel n3b ;
tiltaksmiddel n3b ;
dokumentasjonsmiddel n3b ;
opposisjonsmiddel n3b ;
statsmiddel n3b ;
trafikksikkerhetsmiddel n3b ;
idrettsmiddel n3b ;
fengsel n3b ;
innledningskapittel n3b ;
avstandshinder n3b ;
under n3b ;
lager n3b ;
hovedlager n3b ;
delelager n3b ;
fryselager n3b ;
kistelager n3b ;
boklager n3b ;
kornlager n3b ;
møteplager n3b ;
reguleringslager n3b ;
kjøttlager n3b ;
lintøylager n3b ;
teater n3b ;
dramateater n3b ;
dukketeater n3b ;
nasjonalteater n3b ;
regionteater n3b ;
radioteater n3b ;
amatørteater n3b ;
enmannsteater n3b ;
fjernsynsteater n3b ;
prosjektteater n3b ;
arbeidsmarkedsspekter n3b ;
produktspekter n3b ;
alter n3b ;
filter n3b ;
oljefilter n3b ;
senter n3b ;
bygdesenter n3b ;
barnesenter n3b ;
kjøpesenter n3b ;
karrieresenter n3b ;
skattesenter n3b ;
fylkeskultursenter n3b ;
søknadssenter n3b ;
utviklingssenter n3b ;
likestillingssenter n3b ;
veiledningssenter n3b ;
utredningssenter n3b ;
forskningssenter n3b ;
utdanningssenter n3b ;
undervisningssenter n3b ;
opplæringssenter n3b ;
verdenssenter n3b ;
mannssenter n3b ;
dokumentasjonssenter n3b ;
kunnskapssenter n3b ;
identitetssenter n3b ;
reindriftssenter n3b ;
kunstsenter n3b ;
lesekvarter n3b ;
semester n3b ;
skyldregister n3b ;
merkeregister n3b ;
venteregister n3b ;
pukkregister n3b ;
anleggsregister n3b ;
foretaksregister n3b ;
eiendomsregister n3b ;
skafthylster n3b ;
mønster n3b ;
kjøremønster n3b ;
bevegelsesmønster n3b ;
foster n3b ;
bakepulver n3b ;
personalium n4b ;
genitalium n4b ;
skatteforum n4b ;
samarbeidsforum n4b ;
utviklingsforum n4b ;
museumsforum n4b ;
diskusjonsforum n4b ;
trafikksikkerhetsforum n4b ;
storfe n3c ;
fjørfe n3c ;
bufe n3c ;
småfe n3c ;
hovedvirkemiddel n3c ;
strukturvirkemiddel n3c ;
navigasjonshjelpemiddel n3c ;
kompetansehevingsmiddel n3c ;
rusmiddel n3c ;
språkprosjektmiddel n3c ;
pulver n3c ;
nummer+N+Neu+Pl:numre 0-ne ;
amfetamin n3 ;
perlon n3 ;
lauvtre:lauvtr TRE ;
fiksfakseri n3 ;
preambel n5 ;
spillemiddel n5 ;
tippemiddel n5 ;
stalinorgel n5 ;
termometer n4 ;
